en: Banknote Verifiers
xx: Banknote Verifiers
cs: Ověřovače pravosti bankovek
da: Pengeseddelkontrol
de: Geldscheinprüfgeräte
es: Detectores de billetes
fr: Détecteurs de faux billets
it: Verificatori di banconote
ja: 偽札検知器
nl: Controleapparaten voor bankbiljetten
no: Seddelsjekkere
pl: Testery do banknotów
pt: Verificadores de cédulas
ru: Оборудование для проверки банкнот
sv: Sedelverifiering
tr: Banknot Kontrol Cihazları

en: Cash Register & POS Terminal Accessories
xx: Cash Register & POS Terminal Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pokladnám a prodejním terminálům
da: Tilbehør til kasseapparater og kasseterminaler
de: Zubehör für Ladenkassen & POS-Terminals
es: Accesorios para terminales de PdS y cajas registradoras
fr: Accessoires pour caisses enregistreuses et terminaux de point de vente
it: Accessori per terminali POS e registratori di cassa
ja: キャッシュレジスター・POS端末関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kassa's en betaalautomaten
no: Tilbehør til kassaapparater og POS-terminaler
pl: Kasy fiskalne i produkty związane z obsługą terminali
pt: Acessórios para terminais de ponto de venda e caixas registradoras
ru: Принадлежности для кассовых аппаратов и терминалов в торговых точках
sv: Tillbehör till kassaapparater och butiksterminaler
tr: Yazarkasa ve POS Terminali Aksesuarları

en: Cash Drawers & Trays
xx: Cash Drawers & Trays
cs: Pokladny a pokladní zásuvky
da: Kontantskuffer
de: Kassenschubladen
es: Cajas registradoras
fr: Tiroirs-caisses
it: Cassetti per contanti
ja: キャッシュドロワー
nl: Geldladen
no: Kassaskuffer
pl: Szuflady kasowe
pt: Gavetas de dinheiro
ru: Выдвижные ящики-кассы
sv: Kassalådor
tr: Para Çekmeceleri

en: Credit Card Terminals
xx: Credit Card Terminals
cs: Platební terminály pro platby kartou
da: Betalingsterminaler
de: Kreditkartenterminals
es: Terminales para tarjetas de crédito
fr: Terminaux de carte bancaire
it: Terminali per carte di credito
ja: クレジットカード端末
nl: Creditcardterminals
no: Kredittkortterminaler
pl: Terminale płatnicze
pt: Terminais de cartão de crédito
ru: Терминалы для приема платежей с пластиковых карт
sv: Kreditkortsterminaler
tr: Kredi Kartı Terminalleri

en: Signature Capture Pads
xx: Signature Capture Pads
cs: Snímací podložky na podpisy
da: Elektronisk underskriftsregistrering
de: Unterschriftenpads
es: Capturadores de firma
fr: Tablettes pour signature numérique
it: Dispositivi di firma digitale
ja: 電子サインパッド
nl: Pads voor vastleggen van handtekening
no: Signaturlesere
pl: Pady do składania podpisu
pt: Pads para captura de assinaturas
ru: Устройства ввода подписи
sv: Signaturplattor
tr: İmza Alma Cihazları

en: Cash Registers & POS Terminals
xx: Cash Registers & POS Terminals
cs: Pokladny a prodejní terminály
da: Kasseapparater og kasseterminaler
de: Ladenkassen & POS-Terminals
es: Terminales de PdS y cajas registradoras
fr: Caisses enregistreuses et terminaux de point de vente
it: Terminali POS e registratori di cassa
ja: キャッシュレジスター・POS端末
nl: Kassa's en betaalautomaten
no: Kassaapparater og POS-terminaler
pl: Kasy fiskalne i elektroniczne terminale kasowe
pt: Terminais de ponto de venda e caixas registradoras
ru: Кассовые аппараты и терминалы в торговых точках
sv: Kassaapparater och butiksterminaler
tr: Yazarkasalar ve POS Terminalleri

en: Cash Registers
xx: Cash Registers
cs: Registrační pokladny
da: Kasseapparater
de: Ladenkassen
es: Caja registradora
fr: Caisses enregistreuses
it: Registratori di cassa
ja: キャッシュレジスター
nl: Kassa's
no: Kasseapparat
pl: Kasy fiskalne
pt: Caixa registradora
ru: Кассовые аппараты
sv: Kassaapparater
tr: Yazar Kasalar

en: POS Terminals
xx: POS Terminals
cs: Prodejní terminály
da: Kasseterminaler
de: POS-Terminals
es: Terminales de punto de venta
fr: Terminaux de paiement électronique
it: Terminali POS
ja: POS端末
nl: Betaalautomaten
no: Betalingsterminaler
pl: Terminale POS
pt: Máquina de cartão com terminal POS
ru: POS-терминалы
sv: Betalterminaler
tr: POS Terminalleri

en: Coin & Bill Counters
xx: Coin & Bill Counters
cs: Počítačky mincí a bankovek
da: Mønt- og seddeltællere
de: Geldzählmaschinen für Münzen und Scheine
es: Contadores de billetes y monedas
fr: Compteurs de pièces et de billets
it: Contamonete e contabanconote
ja: 硬貨・紙幣計数機
nl: Tellers voor munten en bankbiljetten
no: Mynt- og seddeltellere
pl: Liczarki do pieniędzy
pt: Contadores de moedas e notas
ru: Счётно-денежные машины
sv: Mynt- och sedelräknare
tr: Bozuk Para ve Banknot Sayma Makineleri

en: Money Changers
xx: Money Changers
cs: Měniče peněz
da: Valutahandlere
de: Geldwechsler
es: Cambistas
fr: Distributeurs de monnaie
it: Cambiavalute
ja: 両替機
nl: Geldwisselaars
no: Pengevekslere
pl: Rozmieniarki pieniędzy
pt: Máquinas de câmbio de dinheiro
ru: Автоматы для размена денег
sv: Valutaväxling
tr: Para Bozma Makineleri

en: Money Deposit Bags
xx: Money Deposit Bags
cs: Vaky na peníze
da: Pengesække
de: Geldtaschen
es: Bolsas de dinero
fr: Pochettes de dépôt d'argent
it: Borse per deposito denaro
ja: 鍵付セキュリティポーチ
nl: Geldzakjes
no: Pengeposer
pl: Saszetki na pieniądze
pt: Sacos para depósito de dinheiro
ru: Инкассаторские сумки
sv: Depositionspåsar för kontanter
tr: Para Torbaları

en: Paper Coin Wrappers & Bill Straps
xx: Paper Coin Wrappers & Bill Straps
cs: Papírové obaly na mince a pásky na bankovky
da: Møntruller og seddelbanderoler
de: Münzrollenpapier & Geldscheinbanderolen
es: Envoltorios de monedas de papel y fajas para billetes
fr: Tubes de monnaie et bracelets pour billets
it: Involucri di carta per monete e fascette banconote
ja: 硬貨包装紙・紙幣用帯
nl: Papieren wikkels voor munten en bandjes voor bankbiljetten
no: Mynt-innpakningspapir og seddelbånd
pl: Papierowe rolki na monety i banderole na monety
pt: Envoltórios de papel para moedas e tiras de papel para notas
ru: Бумажная упаковка для монет и ленты для банкнот
sv: Myntrör och sedelband
tr: Bozuk Para Ambalaj Kağıtları ve Deste Bantları

en: Paper & Plastic Shopping Bags
xx: Paper & Plastic Shopping Bags
cs: Papírové a plastové nákupní tašky
da: Papir- og plastikposer
de: Einkaufstüten aus Papier & Plastik
es: Bolsas de plástico y papel
fr: Sacs plastiques et sacs en papier
it: Sacchetti di carta e plastica
ja: レジ袋・紙袋
nl: Papieren en plastic tassen
no: Bæreposer i plast og papir
pl: Reklamówki papierowe i plastikowe
pt: Sacolas de compras plásticas e de papel
ru: Бумажные и полиэтиленовые пакеты для покупок
sv: Plastpåsar
tr: Kağıt ve Plastik Alışveriş Çantaları

en: Pricing Guns
xx: Pricing Guns
cs: Etiketovací kleště
da: Prispistoler
de: Preisauszeichnungsgeräte
es: Etiquetadoras de precios
fr: Pistolets étiqueteurs de prix
it: Prezzatrici
ja: ラベラー
nl: Prijspistolen
no: Prispistoler
pl: Metkownice
pt: Pistolas marcadoras de preço
ru: Пистолеты для нанесения ценников
sv: Prislappfästare
tr: Fiyat Etiketleme Makineleri

en: Retail Display Cases
xx: Retail Display Cases
cs: Prodejní regály
da: Detaildisplaykasser
de: Vitrinen
es: Mostradores
fr: Vitrines de vente au détail
it: Vetrine per esposizioni
ja: 店舗用展示ケース
nl: Etalagekasten
no: Utstillingsmontre
pl: Gabloty sklepowe
pt: Balcões-vitrine para lojas
ru: Витрины для розничных магазинов
sv: Skyltskåp för butik
tr: Perakende Vitrinleri

en: Retail Display Props & Models
xx: Retail Display Props & Models
cs: Atrapy zboží
da: Rekvisitter til detailhandlen
de: Schaufensterdeko & -puppen
es: Atrezo y modelos para escaparates de tiendas
fr: Mannequins et accessoires pour vitrines
it: Modelli ed espositori per vendita al dettaglio
ja: 店舗展示用製品見本
nl: Winkeldummy's
no: Utstillingsmodeller og -rekvisita for detaljhandel
pl: Rekwizyty i modele na wystawy sklepowe
pt: Réplicas e objetos de cena para lojas
ru: Макеты и модели для витрин
sv: Skyltningsmaterial och -dockor för detaljhandel
tr: Perakende Vitrin Objeleri ve Mankenleri

en: Science & Laboratory
xx: Science & Laboratory
cs: Věda a laboratoře
da: Videnskab og laboratorier
de: Wissenschaft & Labor
es: Ciencia y laboratorio
fr: Sciences et laboratoire
it: Scienza e laboratorio
ja: 科学・実験
nl: Wetenschap en laboratoriums
no: Forskning og laboratorium
pl: Badania naukowe i laboratoryjne
pt: Ciência e laboratório
ru: Лабораторное и научное оборудование
sv: Vetenskap och laboratorium
tr: Bilim ve Laboratuvar

en: Biochemicals
xx: Biochemicals
cs: Biochemikálie
da: Biokemikalier
de: Biochemikalien
es: Productos bioquímicos
fr: Éléments biochimiques
it: Prodotti biochimici
ja: 生化学
nl: Biochemicaliën
no: Biokjemikalier
pl: Odczynniki biochemiczne
pt: Bioquímicos
ru: Биохимические реагенты
sv: Biokemikalier
tr: Biyokimyasallar

en: Dissection Kits
xx: Dissection Kits
cs: Pitevní sady
da: Dissektionssæt
de: Sezierinstrumente
es: Kits de disección
fr: Kits de dissection
it: Kit di dissezione
ja: 解剖用具セット
nl: Ontleedsets
no: Disseksjonssett
pl: Zestawy autopsyjne
pt: Kits de dissecação
ru: Препаровальные наборы
sv: Dissekeringsutrustning
tr: Diseksiyon Setleri

en: Laboratory Chemicals
xx: Laboratory Chemicals
cs: Laboratorní chemikálie
da: Laboratorie – kemikalier
de: Laborchemikalien
es: Productos químicos de laboratorio
fr: Produits chimiques de laboratoire
it: Prodotti chimici laboratorio
ja: 実験用科学薬品
nl: Chemische producten voor laboratoriums
no: Laboratoriekjemikalier
pl: Chemikalia laboratoryjne
pt: Produtos químicos de laboratório
ru: Лабораторные химикаты
sv: Laboratoriekemikalier
tr: Laboratuvar Kimyasalları